apertium-panm/apertium-pan.pan_Guru.dix
    <!-- SECTION: Pronouns -->
    <pardef n="/ਕੀ__prn">       
      <e><p><l>ਕੀ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/><s n="aa"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕੀ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/><s n="aa"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕੀ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sp"/><s n="aa"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕੌਣ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nn"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕੌਣ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nn"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਸ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਨ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਸ ਤੋਂ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਤੋਂ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਸੇ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਕਿਸ ਨੂੰ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਕਿਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਨੂੰ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਨੂੰ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਕਿਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਨੂੰ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਸ ਦੀ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਸ ਦੇ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਸ ਦਾ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਦੀ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਦੇ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਦਾ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਸਨੇ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਨੇ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਸ ਵਿਚ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਵਿਚ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>	
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="ਮੈਂ__prn">
      <e><p><l>ਮੈਂ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਮੈਂ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਮੈਨੂੰ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਅਸਾਨੂੰ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਮੈਥੋਂ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਸਾਨੂੰ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਅਸੀਂ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਅਸਾਂ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਮੇਰ/ਾ__prn">
      <e><p><l>ਾ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਿਆਂ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>ਿਆ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>ਿਓ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਮੇਰ/ੀ__prn">
      <e><p><l>ੀ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>ੀਏ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀਆਂ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀਆਂ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>ੀਓ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

<!--Second Person -->
    <pardef n="ਤੇਰ/ਾ__prn">
      <e><p><l>ਾ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਿਆਂ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਤੇਰ/ੀ__prn">
      <e><p><l>ੀ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀਆਂ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀਆਂ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਤੂੰ__prn">
      <e><p><l>ੂੰ</l><r>ਤ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੂੰ</l><r>ਤ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੁਸੀਂ</l><r>ਤ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੁਸਾਂ</l><r>ਤ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੈਥੋਂ</l><r>ਤ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੈਨੂੰ</l><r>ਤ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੁਹਾਨੂੰ</l><r>ਤ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੁਹਾਥੋਂ</l><r>ਤ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੈਂ</l><r>ਤ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੈਂ</l><r>ਤ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

<!-- Third Person -->
    <pardef n="ਉ/__prn">
      <e><p><l>ਹ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਸ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹਨਾਂ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹਨੂੰ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ਮੈਂ"><i></i><par n="ਮੈਂ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮੇਰਾ"><i>ਮੇਰ</i><par n="ਮੇਰ/ਾ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮੇਰੀ"><i>ਮੇਰ</i><par n="ਮੇਰ/ੀ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ਤੇਰਾ"><i>ਤੇਰ</i><par n="ਤੇਰ/ਾ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ਤੁਹਾਡਾ"><i>ਤੁਹਾਡ</i><par n="ਤੇਰ/ਾ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ਤੇਰੀ"><i>ਤੇਰ</i><par n="ਤੇਰ/ੀ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ਤੁਹਾਡੀ"><i>ਤੁਹਾਡ</i><par n="ਤੇਰ/ੀ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ਉਹ"><i>ਉ</i><par n="ਉ/__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ਇਹ"><i>ਇ</i><par n="ਉ/__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ਕੀ"><i></i><par n="/ਕੀ__prn"/></e>
